Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE C. AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE

CHAPTER 1951. GENERAL PROVISIONS: AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE

Sec. 1951.001. RATES FOR AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE. Rates for personal and commercial automobile insurance in this state are determined as provided by Chapter 2251 and Article 5.13-2.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1951.002. RULES. The commissioner may adopt and enforce reasonable rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this subtitle.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1951.003. FORMER MILITARY VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "former military vehicle" has the meaning assigned by Section 504.502, Transportation Code.

(b) A rating plan that includes a classification applicable to antique, privately owned passenger vehicles that are maintained primarily for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, or other functions of public interest and that may be used occasionally for other purposes must include in that classification former military vehicles maintained for those uses.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 1951.004. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) An insurer, or an officer or representative of an insurer, commits an offense if the insurer, officer, or representative violates:

(1) Section 1951.001, 1951.002, 1952.051, 1952.052, 1952.053, 1952.054, or 1952.055;

(2) Subchapter B, Chapter 1806;

(3) Subchapter C, Chapter 1953;

(4) Chapter 254; or

(5) Article 5.01, 5.03, 5.06, 5.10, or 5.11.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $500.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 2H.002, eff. April 1, 2009.